Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.190

Use of a summary face sheet or cover sheet with the filing of certain documents authorized.

Where the secretary of state determines that a summary face sheet or cover sheet would expedite review of any documents made under Title 23B RCW, or chapter 18.100, 23.86, 23.90, 24.03A, 24.06, 24.12, 24.20, 24.24, 24.36, 25.10, or 25.15 RCW, the secretary of state may require the use of a summary face sheet or cover sheet that accurately reflects the contents of the attached document. The secretary of state may, by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW, specify the required contents of any summary face sheet and the type of document or documents in which the summary face sheet will be required, in addition to any other filing requirements which may be applicable.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5221; 2016 c 202 s 62; 1991 c 72 s 56; 1989 c 307 s 41; 1982 c 35 s 193.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.

Application—1989 c 307: See RCW 23.86.900.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.